Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Subarticle D. Special Provisions for Limited Liability Trust Companies.

§ 81-27-6.301.
Filing of notice of full liability.

A limited liability trust company shall file with the commissioner a copy of any participation agreement by which a participant of the limited liability trust company agrees to become a full liability participant and the name and address of each full liability participant. Solely that portion of the filed copy containing the designation of each full liability participant shall be a public record.

The commissioner may require a complete copy of the participation agreement to be filed with the department, regardless of whether the state trust company has a full liability participant, except that the provisions of the participation agreement other than those by which a participant of the limited liability trust company agrees to become a full liability participant are confidential and subject to release only as provided by Subarticle B of Article 2 of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.302.
Liability of participants and managers.

Except as provided by subsection (b) of this section, the participants, participant-transferees, and managers of a limited liability trust company may not be held liable for a debt, obligation, or liability of the limited liability trust company, including a debt, obligation, or liability under a judgment, decree, or order of court. A participant, other than a full liability participant, or a manager of a limited liability trust company is not a proper party to proceedings by or against a limited liability trust company, unless the object of the proceeding is to enforce a participant’s or manager’s right against or liability to a limited liability trust company.

A full liability participant of a limited liability trust company is liable under a judgment, decree, or order of court for a debt, obligation, or liability of the limited liability trust company that accrued during the participation of the full liability participant in the limited liability trust company and before the full liability participant or a successor in interest files a notice of withdrawal as a full liability participant from the limited liability trust company with the commissioner. The filed notice of withdrawal is a public record.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.303.
Contracting debts and obligations.

Except as provided by this section or the articles of association of the limited liability trust company, debts, liabilities, and other obligations may be contracted for or incurred on behalf of a limited liability trust company by:

A majority of the managers, if management of the limited liability trust company has been vested in a board of managers;

A majority of the managing participants; or

An officer or other agent vested with actual or apparent authority to contract for or incur the debt, liability, or other obligation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.304.
Management of limited liability trust company.

Management of a limited liability trust company is vested in the participants in proportion to each participant’s contribution to capital, as adjusted periodically to properly reflect any additional contribution. The articles of association may provide that management of a limited liability trust company is vested in a board of managers to be elected annually by the participants as prescribed by the bylaws.

Participants of a limited liability trust company may not retain management and must elect a board of managers if:

Any participant is disqualified from serving as a managing participant under Section 81-27-6.203;

The limited liability trust company has fewer than five (5) or more than twenty-five (25) participants; or

Any participant has been removed by the commissioner under Subarticle A of Article 6 of this chapter.

The articles of association, bylaws, and participation agreement of a limited liability trust company may use the terms “director” and “board” instead of “manager” and “board of managers,” respectively.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.305.
Withdrawal or reduction of participant’s contribution to capital.

A participant may not receive from a limited liability trust company any part of the participant’s contribution to capital until:

All liabilities of the state trust company, except liabilities to participants on account of contribution to capital, have been paid or, if after the withdrawal or reduction, sufficient property of the state trust company will remain to pay all liabilities of the state trust company, except liabilities to participants on account of contribution to capital;

All participants consent, unless the return of the contribution to capital may be demanded as provided by this article; or

The articles of association are canceled or amended to set out the withdrawal or reduction.

A participant may demand the return of the participant’s contribution to capital on the dissolution of the limited liability trust company and the failure by the full liability participants to exercise the right for the business of the limited liability trust company to be carried on by the remaining participants as provided by Section 81-27-6.307.

Unless allowed by the articles of association or by the unanimous consent of all participants of the limited liability trust company, a participant may demand the return of the participant’s contribution to capital only in cash.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.306.
Interest in limited liability trust company; transferability of interest.

The interest of a participant or participant-transferee in a limited liability trust company is the personal estate of the participant or the participant-transferee and may be transferred as provided by the bylaws or the participation agreement. A transferee of a participant’s interest has the status of a participant-transferee and does not by the transfer become a participant or obtain a right to participate in the management of the limited liability trust company. A participant-transferee is entitled to receive only a share of profits, return of contribution, or other distributive benefit in respect to the interest transferred to which the participant who transferred the interest would have been entitled. A participant-transferee may become a participant only as provided by the bylaws or the participation agreement.

A limited liability trust company may add additional participants in the same manner as participant-transferees after payment in full of the capital contribution to the limited liability trust company payable for the issuance of additional participation interests.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.307.
Dissolution.

A limited liability trust company organized under this article is dissolved on:

The expiration of the period fixed for the duration of the limited liability trust company;

A vote to dissolve or the execution of a written consent to dissolve by all full liability participants, if any, and a sufficient number of other participants that combined with all full liability participants hold at least two-thirds (2/3) of the participation shares in each class in the association, or a greater fraction as provided by the articles of association;

Except as provided by the articles of association, the death, adjudication of incompentence, expulsion, bankruptcy, retirement, or resignation of a participant unless a majority in interest of all remaining participants elect in writing not later than the ninetieth day after the date of the event to continue the business of the association; or

The occurrence of an event of dissolution specified in the articles of association.

A dissolution under this section is considered to be the initiation of a voluntary liquidation under Subarticle B of Article 7 of this chapter.

An event of dissolution described by subsection (a)(3) of this section does not cancel or revoke a contract to which the state trust company is a party, including a trust indenture or agreement or voluntary dissolution under Subarticle B of Article 7 of this chapter, until the period for the remaining participants to continue the business of the state trust company has expired without the remaining participants having completed the necessary action to continue the business of the state trust company.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 442, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 81-27-6.308.
Allocation of profits and losses.

The profits and losses of a limited liability trust company may be allocated among the participants and among classes of participants as provided by the participation agreement. Without the prior written approval of the commissioner, the profits and losses must be allocated based on the relative interests of the participants as reflected in the articles of association and related documents filed with and approved by the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.309.
Distributions.

Subject to Section 81-27-4.106, distributions of cash or other assets of a limited liability trust company may be made to the participants as provided by the participation agreement. Without the prior written approval of the commissioner, distributions must be made to the participants based on the relative interests of the participants as reflected in the articles of association and related documents filed with and approved by the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.310.
Other provisions related to a limited liability trust company.

For purposes of the provisions of this chapter other than this subarticle, as the context requires:

A manager and the board of managers are considered to be a director and the board of directors, respectively;

If there is not a board of managers, a participant is considered to be a director and all of the participants are considered to be the board of directors;

A participant or participant-transferee is considered to be a shareholder;

A participation share is considered to be a share of stock; and

A distribution is considered to be a dividend.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.